Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-176
Salvage branded certificate of title; prohibited act; penalty.

Any person who knowingly transfers a wrecked, damaged, or destroyed vehicle in violation of sections 60-171 to 60-177 is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 76.